Tennessee, session 114, HB2176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 33-6-109, is amended by adding "the
legislative librarian," immediately after "The department shall report quarterly to".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2176
012440
- 1 -